District of Columbia statutes.
2-621

Requirement.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, any other requirement that the District of Columbia publish notices in 2 daily newspapers shall be satisfied by publication in at least 2 general circulation newspapers, published in the District of Columbia, once every 2 weeks or more frequently.

Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-81, § 6, 29 DCR 156
1981 Ed., § 1-1621.